Utah statutes.
26-18-2.2.   Director -- Appointment -- Responsibilities.

The director of the division shall be appointed by the governor, after consultation with the executive director, with the advice and consent of the Senate.  The director of the division may employ other employees as necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter, and shall:

(1)  administer the responsibilities of the division as set forth in this chapter;

(2)  prepare and administer the division's budget; and

(3)  establish and maintain a state plan for the Medicaid program in compliance with federal law and regulations.

